04_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<m%>                ! Nasalised stem final alternation

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"

LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
